Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Disposition of Property

16.200.
Renumbering of property having obscured numbers.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall administer a program for the investigation of applications filed pursuant to KRS

514.130

and the disposition of property pursuant to KRS

500.090

.

Upon a finding by the department or a local law enforcement agency assigned by the department to investigate an application filed pursuant to KRS

514.120

that the property is lawfully owned by the applicant, the department shall issue, or cause to be issued, in consultation with any state or federal regulatory agency, a suitable identification number to be affixed to the property together with a document stating the number so issued.

Upon a finding by the department or a local law enforcement agency assigned by the department to investigate an application filed pursuant to KRS

514.120

that the property is not lawfully owned by the applicant, the department shall seize the property or cause it to be seized by the local agency and held for disposition by a court of competent jurisdiction.

The department shall promulgate such administrative regulations as are reasonably necessary to enforce the provisions of this section and KRS

500.090

and

514.130

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 267, § 7, effective July 15, 1980; 2007, ch. 85, § 69, effective June 26, 2007.

16.210.
Delivery to property officer of property taken — Disposition.

Property taken by the Department of Kentucky State Police shall be placed with the property officer of the post to which the officer is assigned.

Property which is forfeited may be disposed of as provided by KRS

500.090

or KRS

500.092

, whichever is applicable; however, the proceeds of any sale shall go to the state or be distributed as otherwise provided by law.

All other property may be disposed of as provided in KRS

67.592

and

67.594

except that all proceeds from any sale shall go to the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 606, § 125, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 70, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 100, § 9, effective June 25, 2009.

16.220.
Public auction of confiscated firearms — Disposition of proceeds — Department of Kentucky State Police treatment of transferred firearms.

Subject to the duty to return confiscated firearms to innocent owners pursuant to KRS

500.090

, all firearms confiscated by the Department of Kentucky State Police and not retained for official use pursuant to KRS

500.090

shall be sold at public auction to federally licensed firearms dealers holding a license appropriate for the type of firearm sold. Any provision of KRS Chapter 45 or 45A relating to disposition of property to the contrary notwithstanding, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall:

Conduct any auction specified by this section;

Retain for departmental use twenty percent (20%) of the gross proceeds from any auction specified by this section; and

Transfer remaining proceeds of the sale to the account of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security for use as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Prior to the sale of any firearm, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall make an attempt to determine if the firearm to be sold has been stolen or otherwise unlawfully obtained from an innocent owner and return the firearm to its lawful innocent owner, unless that person is ineligible to purchase a firearm under federal law.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall receive firearms and ammunition confiscated by or abandoned to every law enforcement agency in Kentucky. The department shall dispose of the firearms received in the manner specified in subsection (1) of this section. However, firearms which are not retained for official use, returned to an innocent lawful owner, or transferred to another government agency or public museum shall be sold as provided in subsections (1) and (3) of this section.

The proceeds of firearms sales shall be utilized by the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security to provide grants to city, county, charter county, unified local government, urban-county government, and consolidated local government police departments; university safety and security departments organized pursuant to KRS

164.950

; school districts that employ special law enforcement officers as defined in KRS

61.900

; and sheriff’s departments for the purchase of:

Body armor for sworn peace officers of those departments and service animals, as defined in KRS

525.010

, of those departments;

Firearms or ammunition;

Electronic control devices, electronic control weapons, or electro-muscular disruption technology; and

Body-worn cameras.

In awarding grants under this section, the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall give first priority to providing and replacing body armor and second priority to providing firearms and ammunition, with residual funds available for the purchase of body-worn cameras, electronic control devices, electronic control weapons, or electro-muscular disruption technology. Body armor purchased by the department receiving grant funds shall meet or exceed the standards issued by the National Institute of Justice for body armor. No police or sheriff’s department shall apply for a grant to replace existing body armor unless that body armor has been in actual use for a period of five (5) years or longer. Any department applying for grant funds for body-worn cameras shall develop a policy for their use and shall submit that policy with its application for the grant funds to the Office of Homeland Security as part of the application process.

The Department of Kentucky State Police may transfer a machine gun, short-barreled shotgun, short-barreled rifle, silencer, pistol with a shoulder stock, any other weapon, or destructive device as defined by the National Firearms Act which is subject to registration under the National Firearms Act and is not properly registered in the national firearms transfer records for those types of weapons, to the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms of the United States Department of Justice, after a reasonable attempt has been made to transfer the firearm to an eligible state or local law enforcement agency or to an eligible museum and no eligible recipient will take the firearm or weapon. National Firearms Act firearms and weapons which are properly registered and not returned to an innocent lawful owner or retained for official use as provided in this section shall be sold to properly licensed dealers under subsection (3) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 124, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 405, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 281, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 86, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 41, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 47, § 10, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 85, § 71, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 96, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2014, ch. 120, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2014, ch. 126, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2016 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2014). This statute was amended by 2014 Ky. Acts chs. 120, sec. 2, and 126, sec. 1, which are identical and have been codified together.